District of Columbia statutes.
38-152

Education of pages.

The Board of Education of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized to employ such personnel for the education of pages as may be required and to pay compensation for such services in accordance with such rates of compensation as the Board of Education may prescribe.

July 10, 1972, 86 Stat. 441, Pub. L. 92-342, § 101
Aug. 5, 1977, 91 Stat. 671, Pub. L. 95-94, title I
1981 Ed., § 31-118.
1973 Ed., § 31-121.